Illinois, session 104th, HB3716.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 6205-455 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-455 new)8    Sec. 205-455. Local farmer grant program for expectant 9mothers in need.10    (a) In this Section:11    "Expectant mother" means an individual who is pregnant.12    "Expectant mother in need" means an expectant mother whose 13household income does not exceed 200% of the poverty 14guidelines updated periodically in the Federal Register by the 15U.S. Department of Health and Human Services under the 16authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).17    "Farmer" means a person who owns or manages a farm.18    "Farm" means the main place of business of the farmer, 19where the farmer is engaged in agriculture, raising living 20organisms for food.21    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall, by 22rule, create a grant program to award grants of up to $250,000 23to cover the costs and labor of any qualified applicant farmer   HB3716- 2 -LRB104 11228 BDA 21310 b1to distribute healthy, free food to expectant mothers in need 2who reside in the same county or in a municipality within 20 3miles of the farmer's farm. The Department shall determine 4that the applicant is a qualified applicant if the following 5are all true:6        (1) The applicant is a farmer.7        (2) The applicant has a feasible plan for the 8    distribution of health, free, and local food produced by 9    the farmer to expectant mothers in need in the same county 10    or in a municipality within 20 miles of the farmer's farm, 11    in the determination of the Department.12        (3) The applicant is a trustworthy individual or 13    business, in the determination of the Department.14        (4) All other requirements set by rule by the 15    Department have been met by the applicant. 16    (c) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 17Section.